Utah statutes.
67-21-9.   Notice of contents of this chapter -- Posting.

(1)  An employer shall post notices and use other appropriate means to keep employees informed of their protections and obligations under this chapter.

(2)  Upon request by an employee, or when an employee alleges an adverse action, the employer shall provide the employee with a copy of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 427, 2013 General Session

